test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_eemeed_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - kilgool: # MLO, ok Only short form 1B g-v, CCVV > CV
    kilgool+N+Sg+Nom: kilgool
    kilgool+N+Sg+Gen: kilgool
    kilgool+N+Sg+Acc: kilgool
    kilgool+N+Sg+Ill: kilgolân
    kilgool+N+Sg+Loc: kilgolist
    kilgool+N+Sg+Com: kilgoláin
    kilgool+N+Sg+Abe: kilgoolttáá
    kilgool+N+Ess: kilgolin
    kilgool+N+Par: kilgolid
    kilgool+N+Pl+Nom: kilgoleh
    kilgool+N+Pl+Gen: kilgolij
    kilgool+N+Pl+Acc: kilgolijd
    kilgool+N+Pl+Ill: kilgoláid
    kilgool+N+Pl+Loc: kilgolijn
    kilgool+N+Pl+Com: kilgolijguin
    kilgool+N+Pl+Abe: kilgolijttáá

  Noun - čohhoom: # MLO, ok 1B g-v, hhoo-›ho
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Nom: čohhoom
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Gen: čohhoom
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Acc: čohhoom
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Ill: [čohomân, čohomân]
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Loc: [čohomist, čohomist]
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Com: [čohomáin, čohomáin]
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Abe: čohhoomttáá
    čohhoom+N+Ess: [čohomin, čohomin]
    čohhoom+N+Par: [čohomid, čohomid]
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Nom: [čohomeh, čohomeh]
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Gen: [čohomij, čohomij]
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Acc: [čohomijd, čohomijd]
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Ill: [čohomáid, čohomáid]
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Loc: [čohomijn, čohomijn]
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Com: [čohomijguin, čohomijguin]
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Abe: [čohomijttáá, čohomijttáá]

  Noun - kolgooh: # MLO, ok Only short
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Nom: kolgooh
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Gen: kolgooh
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Acc: kolgooh
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Ill: kolgohân
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Loc: kolgohist
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Com: kolgoháin
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Abe: kolgoohttáá
    kolgooh+N+Ess: kolgohin
    kolgooh+N+Par: kolgohid
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Nom: kolgoheh
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Gen: kolgohij
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Acc: kolgohijd
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Ill: kolgoháid
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Loc: kolgohijn
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Com: kolgohijguin
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Abe: kolgohijttáá

  Noun - iššeed: # MLO, ok
    iššeed+N+Sg+Nom: iššeed
    iššeed+N+Sg+Gen: iššeed
    iššeed+N+Sg+Acc: iššeed
    iššeed+N+Sg+Ill: [išedân, išedân]
    iššeed+N+Sg+Loc: [išedist, išedist]
    iššeed+N+Sg+Com: [išedáin,išedáin]
    iššeed+N+Sg+Abe: iššeedttáá
    iššeed+N+Ess: [išedin, išedin]
    iššeed+N+Par: [išedid, išedid]
    iššeed+N+Pl+Nom: [išedeh, išedeh]
    iššeed+N+Pl+Gen: [išedij, išedij]
    iššeed+N+Pl+Acc: [išedijd, išedijd]
    iššeed+N+Pl+Ill: [išedáid, išedáid]
    iššeed+N+Pl+Loc: [išedijn, išedijn]
    iššeed+N+Pl+Com: [išedijguin, išedijguin]
    iššeed+N+Pl+Abe: [išedijttáá, išedijttáá]

  Noun - vinnjooh: # 1B - MLO, ok; short
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Nom: vinnjooh
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Gen: vinnjooh
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Acc: vinnjooh
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Ill: vinjohân
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Loc: vinjohist
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Com: vinjoháin
    vinnjooh+N+Sg+Abe: vinnjoohttáá
    vinnjooh+N+Ess:    vinjohin
    vinnjooh+N+Par:    vinjohid
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Nom: vinjoheh
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Gen: vinjohij
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Acc: vinjohijd
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Ill: vinjoháid
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Loc: vinjohijn
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Com: vinjohijguin
    vinnjooh+N+Pl+Abe: vinjohijttáá

  Noun - suuhâm: # MLO, ok; only short
    suuhâm+N+Sg+Nom: suuhâm
    suuhâm+N+Sg+Gen: suuhâm
    suuhâm+N+Sg+Acc: suuhâm
    suuhâm+N+Sg+Ill: suhâmân
    suuhâm+N+Sg+Loc: suhâmist
    suuhâm+N+Sg+Com: suhâmáin
    suuhâm+N+Sg+Abe: suuhâmttáá
    suuhâm+N+Ess: suhâmin
    suuhâm+N+Par: suhâmid
    suuhâm+N+Pl+Nom: suhâmeh
    suuhâm+N+Pl+Gen: suhâmij
    suuhâm+N+Pl+Acc: suhâmijd
    suuhâm+N+Pl+Ill: suhâmáid
    suuhâm+N+Pl+Loc: suhâmijn
    suuhâm+N+Pl+Com: suhâmijguin
    suuhâm+N+Pl+Abe: suhâmijttáá

  Noun - mááccuh: # MLO, ok 1B The first lexicon for mááccuh is LITTER; only short
    mááccuh+v2+N+Sg+Nom: mááccuh
    mááccuh+v2+N+Sg+Gen: mááccuh
    mááccuh+v2+N+Sg+Acc: mááccuh
    mááccuh+v2+N+Sg+Ill: mácuhân
    mááccuh+v2+N+Sg+Loc: mácuhist
    mááccuh+v2+N+Sg+Com: mácuháin
    mááccuh+v2+N+Sg+Abe: mááccuhttáá
    mááccuh+v2+N+Ess: mácuhin
    mááccuh+v2+N+Par: mácuhid
    mááccuh+v2+N+Pl+Nom: mácuheh
    mááccuh+v2+N+Pl+Gen: mácuhij
    mááccuh+v2+N+Pl+Acc: mácuhijd
    mááccuh+v2+N+Pl+Ill: mácuháid
    mááccuh+v2+N+Pl+Loc: mácuhijn
    mááccuh+v2+N+Pl+Com: mácuhijguin

  Noun - iilâsk: # MLO, ok; only short 1B d-k,  v-v
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Nom: iilâsk
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Gen: iilâsk
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Acc: iilâsk
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Ill: ilâskân
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Loc: ilâskist
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Com: ilâskáin
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Abe: iilâskttáá
    iilâsk+N+Ess: ilâskin
    iilâsk+N+Par: ilâskid
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Nom: ilâskeh
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Gen: ilâskij
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Acc: ilâskijd
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Ill: ilâskáid
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Loc: ilâskijn
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Com: ilâskijguin
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Abe: ilâskijttáá
